Maryland, session 2025, SB0647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0647*

SENATE BILL 647
Article – Election Law
1–306.
(A) THE STATE BOARD SHALL PROVIDE A TOLL–FREE VOTER HOTLINE FOR
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS TO RECEIVE INFORMATION ABOUT VOTING, REQUEST
ELECTION–RELATED MATERIALS, AND REPORT VOTING RIGHTS VIOLATIONS.
(B) THE STATE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS IN COLLABORATION
WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES AND
CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE VOTER HOTLINE.
3–102.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an individual may
become registered to vote if the individual:
(i) is a citizen of the United States;
(ii) is at least 16 years old;
(iii) is a resident of the State as of the day the individual seeks to
register; and
(iv) registers pursuant to this title.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection, an individual
under the age of 18 years:
(i) may vote in a primary election in which candidates are
nominated for a general or special election that will occur when the individual is at least
18 years old; and
(ii) may not vote in any other election.
(b) An individual is not qualified to be a registered voter if the individual:
(1) [has been convicted of a felony and is currently serving a court–ordered
sentence of imprisonment for the conviction;
(2)] is under guardianship for mental disability and a court of competent
jurisdiction has specifically found by clear and convincing evidence that the individual
cannot communicate, with or without accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting
process; or
[(3)] (2) has been convicted of buying or selling votes.

SENATE BILL 647 3
3–504.
(a) (1) (i) Information from the agencies specified in this paragraph shall
be reported to the State Administrator in a format and at times prescribed by the State
Board.
(ii) The Maryland Department of Health shall report the names and
residence addresses (if known) of all individuals at least 16 years of age reported deceased
within the State since the date of the last report.
(iii) [Each month, the clerk of the circuit court for each county and
the administrative clerk for each District Court shall report the names and addresses of all
individuals convicted, in the respective court, of a felony and sentenced to imprisonment
with commitment papers.
(iv)] The clerk of the circuit court for each county shall report the
former and present names and residence addresses (if known) of all individuals whose
names have been changed by decree or order of the court since the date of the last report.
(2) [The State Administrator shall make arrangements with the clerk of
the United States District Court for the District of Maryland to receive reports of names
and addresses, if available, of individuals convicted of a felony in that court and sentenced
to imprisonment with commitment papers.
(3)] The State Administrator shall make arrangements with the United
States Social Security Administration or an entity that receives information from the Social
Security Administration and is approved by the State Administrator to receive reports of
names and addresses, if available, of all Maryland residents at least 16 years of age who
are reported deceased.
[16–202.
(a) A person who has been convicted of a felony and is currently serving a
court–ordered sentence of imprisonment for the conviction, and has been rendered
ineligible to vote pursuant to § 3–102(b) of this article, may not vote or attempt to vote
during the time that the person is rendered ineligible to vote.
(b) A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony and is subject to
imprisonment for not less than 1 year nor more than 5 years.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.